Washington statutes.
RCW 26.40.010

Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to assure the right of every child with disabilities to parental love and care as long as possible, to provide for adequate custody of a child with a disability who has lost parental care, and to make available to the child with a disability the services of the state through its various departments and agencies.

[ 2020 c 274 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 22; 1955 c 272 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.